Mississippi, session 2026, SB2928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Lamar County, Mississippi, in its discretion, may employ the part-time county prosecuting attorney as a full-time elected official during his or her term of office.  Such attorney shall receive additional compensation of ninety percent (90%) of the annual salary of the Lamar County and Youth Court Judge.  The salary authorized by this section and by Section 25-3-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the county prosecuting attorney shall be the sole and complete salary to be paid by Lamar County for such attorney, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.